Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3112
Act; other provisions applicable.

To the extent applicable and when not in conflict with the Nebraska
Professional Association Mutual Insurance Company Act, the provisions of the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act and
Chapters 44 and 77 relating to corporations and insurance shall apply to companies
incorporated pursuant to the Nebraska Professional Association Mutual Insurance
Company Act.

Laws 1978, LB 656, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 219;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 223;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 289.

Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.